Louisiana, session 2026, HB692.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2212.1(Q) and (R) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2212.1. Advertisement and letting to lowest responsible bidder; materials and
supplies; exemptions
* * *
Q.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law contained in this Part to the
contrary, any local government subdivision, as defined in Article VI, Section 44(1)
of the Constitution of Louisiana, may enter into an agreement with one or more
qualified group purchasing organizations for the procurement of materials,
equipment, supplies, or services, including any related installation. Any such
agreement shall require the qualified group purchasing organization to submit a price
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 692 ENROLLED
list for materials, equipment, supplies, or services that it offers. The prices quoted
on the list shall remain in effect for not less than three months. Any such price list
shall be considered to be a valid and binding bid by the qualified group purchasing
organization during the effective period of the agreement, and no additional bid by
the qualified group purchasing organization is necessary.
(2) The price list submitted by a qualified group purchasing organization is
not a public record and shall not be available for public inspection. The agreement
establishing the price list and its effective date is, however, a public record, and that
portion of the price list establishing the price of the materials, equipment, supplies,
or services being procured shall become a public record at the time of opening of
bids or upon the execution of a contract for the procurement of materials, equipment,
supplies, or services.
(3) As used in this Subsection, "qualified group purchasing organization"
means an organization, whether for profit or not-for-profit, of which two or more of
the local governmental subdivisions as described in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
are participating or voting members thereof and which solicit proposals or bids from
vendors of materials, equipment, supplies, or services of the type and nature as may
be procured by any such department, agency, or nonprofit corporation. A qualified
group purchasing organization includes an external procurement activity as defined
in R.S. 39:1556.
(4) Furthermore, any local governmental subdivision may procure materials,
equipment, supplies, or services directly from or through a qualified group
purchasing organization if either the price is less than that for the same or
substantially similar materials, equipment, supplies, or services on the state contract
or bid list or if the same or substantially similar materials, equipment, supplies, or
services are not under state contract or on the state bid list. Nothing contained in this
Subsection shall be construed to authorize a local governmental subdivision to
purchase materials, equipment, supplies, or services from or through an entity or
vendor other than a qualified group purchasing organization as defined in this
Subsection without using a procurement process otherwise provided by state law.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 692 ENROLLED
R. A contract may be awarded for a required supply, service, or major repair
without competition when, under regulations, the chief procurement officer or his
designee above the level of procurement officer determines, in writing, that there is
only one source for the required supply, service, or major repair item.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.